California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) A real estate broker who acts pursuant to Section 10131.1 or subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 10131, and who makes, arranges, or services one or more loans in a calendar year that are secured by real property containing one to four residential units, shall annually file a business activities report, within 90 days after the end of the broker’s fiscal year or within any additional time as the commissioner may allow for filing for good cause. The report shall contain within its scope all of the following information for the fiscal year, relative to the business activities of the broker and those of any other brokers and real estate salespersons acting under that broker’s supervision:

(1) Name and license number of the supervising broker and names and license
 numbers of the real estate brokers and salespersons under that broker’s supervision. The report shall include brokers and salespersons who were under the supervising broker’s supervision for all or part of the year.

(2) A list of the real estate-related activities in which the supervising broker and the brokers and salespersons under the supervising broker’s supervision engaged during the prior year. This listing shall identify all of the following:

(A) Activities relating to mortgages, including arranging, making, or servicing.

(B) Other activities performed under the real estate broker’s or salesperson’s license.

(C) Activities performed under related licenses, including, but not limited to, a license to engage as a finance lender or a finance broker
 under the California Financing Law (Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) of the Financial Code), or a license to engage as a residential mortgage lender or residential mortgage loan servicer under the California Residential Mortgage Lending Act (Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000) of the Financial Code).

(3) A list of the forms of media used by the broker and those under the broker’s supervision to advertise to the public, including print, radio, television, the internet, or other means.

(4) For fixed rate loans made, brokered, or serviced, all of the following:

(A) The total number, aggregate principal amount, lowest interest rate, highest interest rate, and a list of the institutional lenders of record. If the loan was funded by any lender other than an institutional lender, the broker shall
 categorize the loan as privately funded.

(B) The total number and aggregate principal amount of covered loans, as defined in Section 4970 of the Financial Code.

(C) The total number and aggregate principal amount of loans for which Department of Real Estate form RE Form 885 or an equivalent is required.

(5) For adjustable rate loans made, brokered, or serviced, all of the following:

(A) The total number, aggregate principal amount, lowest beginning interest rate, highest beginning interest rate, highest margin, and a list of the institutional lenders of record. If the loan was funded by any lender other than an institutional lender, the broker shall categorize the loan as privately funded.

(B) The total number and aggregate principal amount of covered loans, as defined in Section 4970 of the Financial Code.

(C) The total number and aggregate principal amount of loans for which Department of Real Estate form RE Form 885 or an equivalent is required.

(6) For all loans made, brokered, or serviced, the total number and aggregate principal amount of loans funded by institutional lenders, and the total number and aggregate principal amount of loans funded by private lenders.

(7) For all loans made, brokered, or serviced, the total number and aggregate principal amount of loans that included a prepayment penalty, the minimum prepayment penalty length, the maximum prepayment penalty length, and the number of loans with prepayment penalties whose length exceeded the length of time before the
 borrower’s loan payment amount could increase.

(8) For all loans brokered, the total compensation received by the broker, including yield spread premiums, commissions, and rebates, but excluding compensation used to pay fees for third-party services on behalf of the borrower.

(9) For all mortgage loans made or brokered, the total number of loans for which a mortgage loan disclosure statement was provided in a language other than English, and the number of forms provided per language other than English.

(10) For all mortgage loans serviced, the total amount of funds advanced to be applied toward a payment to protect the security of the note being serviced.

(11) For purposes of this section, an institutional lender has the meaning specified in paragraph
 (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 10232.

(b) A broker subject to this section and Section 10232.2 may file consolidated reports that include all of the information required under this section and Section 10232.2. Those consolidated reports shall clearly indicate that they are intended to satisfy the requirements of both sections.

(c) If a broker subject to this section fails to timely file the report required under this section, the commissioner may cause an examination and report to be made and may charge the broker one and one-half times the cost of making the examination and report. In determining the hourly cost incurred by the commissioner for conducting an examination and preparing the report, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost for all department audit staff performing audits of real estate brokers. If a broker fails to pay the commissioner’s cost
 within 60 days of the mailing of a notice of billing, the commissioner may suspend the broker’s license or deny renewal of that license. The suspension or denial shall remain in effect until the billed amount is paid or the broker’s right to renew a license has expired. The commissioner may maintain an action for the recovery of the billed amount in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(d) The report described in this section is exempted from any requirement of public disclosure by subdivision (b) of Section 7929.000 of the Government Code.

(e) The commissioner may waive the requirement to submit certain information described in paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive, of subdivision (a) if the commissioner determines that this information is duplicative of information required by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, pursuant to Section
 10166.08.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 7.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.08.

Each mortgage loan originator shall submit reports of condition to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry reports of condition, and those reports shall be in the form and shall contain information as the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 63.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.09.

The minimum standards for renewal of an endorsement as a mortgage loan originator shall include the following:

(a) The mortgage loan originator continues to meet the minimum standards for obtaining an endorsement as a mortgage loan originator.

(b) The mortgage loan originator satisfies the annual continuing education requirements described in Section 10166.10.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 6.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.10.

(a) A mortgage loan originator shall complete at least eight hours of continuing education annually, which shall include at least three hours relating to federal law and regulations, two hours of ethics, which shall include instruction on fraud, consumer protection, and fair lending issues, and two hours related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), continuing education courses and course providers shall be reviewed and approved by the commissioner and the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

(c) The commissioner shall have the
 authority to substitute any of the courses described in subdivision (a) for the course requirements of Section 10170.5, subject to a finding that the course requirements in subdivision (a) and the course completion standards in subdivision (g) of Section 10166.06 are substantially equivalent to, and meet the intent of, Section 10170.5.

(d) This section does not preclude any education course, as approved by the commissioner and the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, that is provided by the employer of the mortgage loan originator or an entity that is affiliated with the mortgage loan originator by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate of the employer or entity.

(e) Continuing education may be offered either in a classroom, online, or by any other
 means approved by the commissioner and the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

(f) A mortgage loan originator may only receive credit for a continuing education course in the year in which the course is taken.

(g) A mortgage loan originator may not take the same approved course in the same or successive years to meet the requirements of this section for continuing education.

(h) A mortgage loan originator who is an instructor of an approved continuing education course may receive credit for their own annual continuing education requirement at the rate of two hours credit for every one hour taught.

(i) A person who successfully completes
 the education requirements approved by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry in any state other than California shall be granted credit by the commissioner towards completion of continuing education requirements in this state.

(j) A mortgage loan originator whose license endorsement lapses, expires, or is suspended or revoked, and who wishes to regain their license endorsement, shall complete continuing education requirements for the last year in which the endorsement was held, before issuance of a new or renewed endorsement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 64.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.11.

(a) A real estate broker who acts pursuant to Section 10131.1 or subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 10131 and who makes, arranges, or services loans secured by real property containing one to four residential units, shall keep documents and records that will properly enable the commissioner to determine whether the residential mortgage brokerage, servicing, and lending functions performed by the broker comply with this division and with all applicable rules and orders made by the commissioner. These documents shall include, at a minimum, the documents described in Section 10148. Upon request of the commissioner, a real estate broker shall file an authorization for disclosure to the commissioner of financial records of the broker’s licensed
 business pursuant to Section 7473 of the Government Code.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 10148, the business documents and records of real estate brokers described in subdivision (a) and real estate salespersons acting under those brokers are subject to inspection and examination or audit by the commissioner, at the commissioner’s discretion, after reasonable notice. That real estate broker or salesperson shall, upon request by the commissioner and within the time period specified in that request, allow the commissioner, or the commissioner’s authorized representative, to inspect and copy any business documents and records. The commissioner may suspend or revoke the license of the broker or salesperson if that person fails to produce documents or records within the time period specified in the request.

(c) Inspection and examination or audit reports prepared by the commissioner’s duly designated representatives pursuant to this section are not public records. Those reports may be disclosed to the officers or directors of a licensee that is the subject of the report for the purpose of corrective action. That disclosure shall not operate as a waiver of the exemption specified in Section 7929.000 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 30.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.12.

(a) As often as the commissioner deems necessary and appropriate, the commissioner shall examine the affairs of each real estate broker who is required to notify the commissioner or obtain a license endorsement pursuant to Section 10166.02 for compliance with this part. These examinations shall also include a review of the affairs of all real estate brokers and real estate salespersons acting under the supervision of each real estate broker who is required to file reports with the department pursuant to Section 10166.07. The commissioner shall appoint suitable persons to perform these examinations. The commissioner and his or her appointees may examine the books, records, and documents of the licensee, and may examine the licensee’s officers, directors, employees, or agents under oath
 regarding the licensee’s operations. The commissioner may cooperate with any agency of the state or federal government, other states, agencies, the Federal National Mortgage Association, or the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation. The commissioner may accept an examination conducted by one of these entities in place of an examination by the commissioner under this section, unless the commissioner determines that the examination does not provide information necessary to enable the commissioner to fulfill his or her responsibilities under this division.

(b) The commissioner may impose a penalty against a real estate broker or real estate salesperson whose affairs are examined or reviewed pursuant to subdivision (a) based on the findings of the examination or review. The commissioner may suspend or revoke the license or license endorsement of a real estate broker or real estate salesperson who fails to pay that penalty. In addition, the
 commissioner may bring an action in an appropriate court of this state to collect payment of the penalty.

(c) Penalties collected pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be deposited into the Consumer Recovery Account of the Real Estate Fund and shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be available for expenditure for the purposes specified in Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 10470).

(d) The statement of the findings of an examination conducted pursuant to this section shall belong to the commissioner and shall not be disclosed to anyone other than the licensee, law enforcement officials, or other state or federal regulatory agencies for further investigation and enforcement. Reports required of licensees by the commissioner under this division and results of examinations performed by the commissioner under this division are the property of the
 commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 8.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.13.

A real estate broker who acts pursuant to Section 10131.1 or subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 10131 and who makes, arranges, or services loans secured by real property containing one to four residential units shall make any special reports to the commissioner that the commissioner may, from time to time, require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 6.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.14.

A real estate broker shall notify the department when he or she is no longer subject to this part. If a broker has already made reports required by Sections 10166.07 and 10166.08 within the year, he or she shall continue reports for that year, but shall notify the department prior to the expiration of that year that he or she will no longer be subject to this part in the succeeding year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 6.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.15.

(a) The commissioner shall regularly report violations of this article, as well as enforcement actions taken against any mortgage loan originator to whom an endorsement has been issued, and enforcement actions taken against any individual for failure to obtain an endorsement as a mortgage loan originator, to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

(b) The commissioner shall establish a process that may be used by mortgage loan originators to challenge information entered into the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry by the commissioner.

(c) The commissioner is authorized to promulgate
 regulations specifying (1) the recordkeeping requirements that mortgage loan
 originators shall satisfy and (2) the penalties that shall apply to mortgage loan originators for violations of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 65.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.16.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 1512 of the SAFE Act, the requirements under any federal or state law regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, and any privilege arising under federal or state law, including the rules of any federal or state court, with respect to that information or material, shall continue to apply to the information or material after the information or material has been disclosed to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry. The information and material may be shared with all state and federal regulatory officials with mortgage industry oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the
 loss of
 confidentiality protections provided by federal or state law.

(b) For these purposes, the commissioner is authorized to enter agreements or sharing arrangements with other governmental agencies, the Conference of State Bank Supervisors, the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators, or other associations representing governmental agencies as established by rule, regulation or order of the commissioner.

(c) Information or material that is subject to a privilege or confidentiality under subdivision (a) shall not be subject to either of the following:

(1) Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or an agency of the federal
 government or the state.

(2) Subpoena or discovery, or admission into evidence, in any private civil action or administrative process, unless with respect to any privilege held by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry with respect to the information or material, the person to whom the information or material pertains waives, in whole or in part, in the discretion of the person, that privilege.

(d) This section shall not apply with respect to the information or material relating to the employment history of, and publicly adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions against, mortgage loan originators that is included in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry for access by the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 66.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.17.

In addition to any other duties imposed upon the commissioner by law, the commissioner shall require mortgage loan originators to be licensed and registered through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry. In order to carry out this requirement the commissioner is authorized to participate in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry. For this purpose, the commissioner may establish by rule, regulation, or order, requirements as necessary, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Background checks for the following:

(1) Criminal history through fingerprint or other databases.

(2) Civil or administrative records.

(3) Credit history.

(4) Any other information as deemed necessary by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

(b) The payment of fees to apply for or renew licenses through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

(c) The setting or resetting as necessary of renewal or reporting dates.

(d) Requirements for amending or surrendering a license or any other activities as the commissioner deems necessary for participation in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 67.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.3. Prepaid Rental Listing Service [10167. - 10167.17.]

10167.

The definitions used in this section shall govern the construction and terms as used in this article:

(a) “Prepaid rental listing service” means the business of supplying prospective tenants with listings of residential real properties for tenancy, by publication or otherwise, pursuant to an arrangement under which the prospective tenants are required to pay an advance or contemporaneous fee (1) specifically to obtain listings or (2) to purchase any other product or service in order to obtain
 listings, but which does not otherwise involve the negotiation of rentals by the person conducting the service. “Prepaid rental listing service” does not include the business of providing roommate referral information designed to assist persons in locating a roommate who meets various selection criteria related to the prospective roommate’s personal traits, characteristics, habits or preferences, and selection criteria related to the residential real property occupied by the prospective roommate.

(b) “Licensee” means a person licensed to conduct a prepaid rental listing service or a person engaged in the business of a prepaid rental listing service under a real estate broker license.

(c) “Location” means the place, other than the main or branch office of a real estate broker, where a prepaid rental listing service business is conducted.

(d) “Designated agent” means the person who is in charge of the business of a prepaid rental listing service at a given location.

(e) “Fee” means the charge required by a licensee (1) to obtain listings of residential real properties for tenancy or (2) to purchase any other product or service in order to obtain listings.

(f) “Service charge” means the amount of the fee that a licensee may retain if a prospective tenant finds housing through a source other than the listings supplied by the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 473, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.1.

This article shall not apply to a newspaper of general circulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1051, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.2.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to engage in the business of a prepaid rental listing service unless licensed in that capacity or unless licensed as a real estate broker.

(b) (1) The requirements of this article apply only to the provision of listings of residential real properties for tenancy by prepaid rental listing services. Except if expressly provided otherwise in this article, the requirements of this article do not apply to any other goods or
 services sold by a prepaid rental listing service as long as the purchase of those goods or services is not required to obtain those listings, and as long as the purchase of those goods or services is not included in the same contract as the contract to provide those listings, and as long as the contract to provide those listings clearly specifies that the purchase of any other goods and services is optional, and as long as the price charged for any other goods and services is fair and reasonable.

(2) In an action alleging that the price charged for any other goods and services is not fair and reasonable, the burden shall be on the commissioner to demonstrate that the price charged unreasonably exceeds the fee customarily charged for the same or comparable goods or services in the community in which the prepaid rental listing service operates. The fact that the price charged for goods or services exceeds the cost incurred by the prepaid rental
 listing service shall not render the price charged for the goods or services to be unfair or unreasonable, so long as the price charged does not unreasonably exceed the fee customarily charged for the same or comparable goods or services in the community in which the prepaid rental listing service operates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.3.

(a) A separate application for a license as a prepaid rental listing service shall be made in writing for each location to be operated by a licensee other than a real estate broker. Each application shall be on forms provided by the department, shall be signed by the applicant, and shall be accompanied by an application fee of one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175), not to exceed two hundred twenty-eight dollars ($228), for the first location, and ninety dollars ($90), not to exceed one hundred seventeen dollars ($117), for each additional location of the applicant.

Applications to add or eliminate locations during the term of a license shall be on forms prescribed by the department. A fee of ninety dollars ($90), not to exceed one hundred seventeen dollars ($117), for the remainder
 of a license term for each location to be added shall accompany the application. Forty dollars ($40), not to exceed fifty-two dollars ($52), of each application fee shall be credited to the Consumer Recovery Account.

(b) A real estate broker may provide a prepaid rental listing service at a licensed office for the conduct of the broker’s real estate brokerage business if the business at the office is conducted under the immediate supervision of the broker or of a real estate salesperson licensed to, and acting on behalf of, the broker.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 4.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.4.

The commissioner may require such proof as they may deem advisable concerning the honesty and truthfulness of (a) any applicant for a license as a prepaid rental listing service, (b) the designated agents of the applicant, (c) the officers, directors, and any persons owning 25 percent or more of the shares of any corporation making such an application, or (d) any person owning or controlling a beneficial ownership interest of 25 percent or more in the entity making application before authorizing the issuance of a license for a location. For this purpose, the commissioner may hold a hearing in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and may refuse to issue a license to an
 applicant who does not furnish satisfactory proof of their honesty and truthfulness or of the honesty and truthfulness of the corporate officers, directors, and shareholders. To assist in this determination, the commissioner shall require the fingerprinting of every original applicant, including designated agents, officers, directors, persons owning 25 percent or more of the shares of the corporate applicant, and persons owning or controlling a beneficial ownership interest of 25 percent or more in the entity making application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 22.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.45.

(a) Pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, the department shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for all of the following, related to “prepaid rental listing services,” as defined in Section 10167:

(1) Original applicants for a license as a prepaid rental listing service.

(2) Licensees with a license as a prepaid rental listing service.

(3) Persons who submit a petition for reinstatement of the person’s license or the reduction of a
 penalty, pursuant to Section 11522 of the Government Code.

(b) The Department of Justice shall provide a state- or federal-level response, pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 23.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.5.

The business at a location licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10167.3 shall be conducted under the immediate supervision of the licensee or a designated agent who is not a designated agent at any other location. Whenever a designated agent ceases permanently to be a designated agent at any location because of death, termination of employment, or any other reason, the licensee, within five days thereafter, shall give written notice to the department. A license issued for a particular location shall automatically expire 60 days after the time the business conducted at such location ceases for any reason to be under the
 charge of and managed by the designated agent of record with the department, unless within such 60-day period the licensee submits written notice of the new designated agent to the department.

A designated agent of the licensed service may serve as designated agent for the location in question as well as for the location for which he or she is the designated agent of record during the period of 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1051, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.6.

Every applicant for a prepaid rental listing service license who is not a resident of this state shall file with the application for a license an irrevocable consent that in any action arising out of the activities of the prepaid rental listing service commenced against him or her in this state, if personal service of process upon him or her cannot be made in this state in the exercise of due diligence, a valid service may be made upon him or her by delivering the process to the Secretary of State.

Insofar as possible, the provisions of Section 1018 of the Code of Civil Procedure relating
 to service of process on the Secretary of State are applicable to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1051, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.7.

Except as provided in Section 10167.8, each licensee shall provide to the department, and at all times maintain in force, a bond in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each location. The bond may be in the form of a corporate surety bond, or a cash deposit. A cash deposit may be deposited by the licensee in an interest-bearing account assigned to the commissioner, with interest earned thereon payable to the licensee. The bond or cash deposit may be utilized by the commissioner for the benefit of any unsatisfied judgment creditor in an action pursuant
 to subdivision (e) of Section 10167.10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 473, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.8.

The requirement of Section 10167.7 shall not apply to any prepaid rental listing service operated by: (a) a person exempt from the payment of federal and state income taxes; (b) an agency of the federal, state, or local government; or (c) a real estate broker conducting a prepaid rental listing service pursuant to a real estate license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1051, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.9.

(a) Prior to the acceptance of a fee, a licensee shall offer the prospective tenant a written contract, either on paper or in electronic form, which shall include at least the following:

(1) The name and license number of the licensee and the addresses and telephone numbers of the principal office or location of the licensee and of the location, or branch office of a real estate broker, providing the listing to the prospective tenant.

(2) Acknowledgment of receipt of the fee, including the amount.

(3) A description of the service to be performed by the licensee, including
 significant conditions, restrictions, and limitations when applicable.

(4) The prospective tenant’s specifications for the rental property, including, but not limited to:

(A) Type of structure, including, but not limited to, detached single-family home, apartment, or duplex.

(B) Location by commonly accepted residential area name, by designation of boundary streets, or by any other manner affording a reasonable means of identifying locations acceptable to the prospective tenant.

(C) Furnished or unfurnished.

(D) Number of bedrooms required.

(E) Maximum
 acceptable monthly rental.

(5) The contract expiration date, which shall not be later than 90 days from the date of execution of the contract.

(6) A clause setting forth the right to a full or partial refund of the fee paid as provided in Section 10167.10.

(7) The signature and printed full name of the licensee or of the designated agent, real estate salesperson, or employee acting on behalf of the licensee. The signature of any person, including any signature required by the terms of the contract to be provided by the prospective tenant, may be provided in any electronic form that provides a reasonable method of indicating that the individual whose signature is required authorized the contract to be signed in that
 electronic form.

(8) A clause in bold type letters outlining the small claims court remedy available to the prospective tenant.

(9) A clause in boldface type letters clearly stating that the purchase of any goods and services other than the provision of listings of residential real properties for tenancy is optional.

(b) (1) The original of each contract, any separate contracts for required goods or services, refund claims, receipts and any other relevant documents shall be retained by the licensee for a period of not less than three years from the date of termination of the contract during that time the contract shall be subject to examination by a duly authorized representative of the commissioner.
 Any records retained pursuant to this subdivision that are stored in the ordinary course of business in digital media shall, upon request of a duly authorized representative of the commissioner, be provided on diskette, CD-ROM, or similar portable digital storage medium. For purposes of this subdivision, the “original” of a contract executed in electronic form shall be either the copy of the contract stored in digital media or a paper printout of that contract.

(2) Any licensee, or employee thereof, shall dispose of the
 documents required to be kept pursuant to paragraph (1) by shredding or other appropriate means so that the identity of the prospective tenant may not be determined from the disposed information alone or in combination with other publicly available information.

(c) The form of contract proposed to be used by a licensee to effect compliance with this section shall be filed with the department prior to use. Any modification of a form previously filed with the department, including a change in the name or business address of the licensee, shall also be filed prior to use. The department shall withhold the issuance or renewal of a license until the department has approved the contract. If a proposed modification to a contract has not been approved or disapproved within 15 working days of being filed with the department, the proposed
 modification shall be deemed approved. If a proposed modification or contract provision is disapproved, the department shall communicate that disapproval in writing to the licensee within 15 working days of being filed with the department, accompanied by a written justification of why the modification or contract
 provision is contrary to the requirements of this article.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, a contract for prepaid rental listing services executed in electronic form, and signed in any electronic form that provides a reasonable method of indicating that the individual whose signature is required authorized the contract to be signed in electronic form, shall be valid to the same extent as an executed written contract. Upon request by the customer, the licensee shall deliver an executed paper copy to the customer within five working days of receiving the request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 15.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.95.

Prior to the acceptance of a fee, and in addition to the contract required pursuant to Section 10167.9, a licensee shall provide the prospective tenant with the following written notice, in a type size of at least 12-point type:
YOU MAY BE ENTITLED TO A REFUND IF YOU DO NOT RECEIVE THE SERVICES YOU HAVE BEEN PROMISED. COMPLETE TERMS AND CONDITIONS GOVERNING THE REFUND TO WHICH YOU MAY BE ENTITLED ARE CONTAINED IN YOUR CONTRACT. THE FOLLOWING IS A SIMPLIFIED SUMMARY OF SOME OF THE RIGHTS DESCRIBED IN YOUR CONTRACT:

If (name of licensee) does not provide you with at least three available rental properties meeting the specifications of
 your contract within five days after you pay the fee charged by (name of licensee), you are entitled to a full refund. To obtain this refund, you must request it from (name of licensee) in writing within 15 days of paying your fee.

If you do not obtain a rental through the services of (name of licensee) during the term of your contract, you are entitled to a refund of your fee, minus a service charge, which may not exceed ____ dollars ($____). To obtain this refund, you must provide (name of licensee) with written documentation or a signed statement that you obtained a rental without the assistance of (name of licensee) or that you did not move. This documentation or signed statement must be provided to (name of licensee) with a written request for refund, within 10 days following the expiration of your contract.

If
 (name of licensee) fails to refund your money, as required by your contract, you may sue (name of licensee) in a small claims court. The court may award you the refund you failed to receive, plus additional damages, up to $1,000.

If you wish to file a complaint about (name of licensee) or if you cannot collect on a court award, you should contact the Department of Real Estate at 1-877-373-4542 or www.dre.ca.gov.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 16.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.10.

(a) (1) A licensee shall refund in full the fee paid by a prospective tenant if the licensee does not, within five days after execution of the contract, supply at least three rental properties then available to the prospective tenant and meeting the specifications of the contract, unless the prospective tenant obtains a rental through the services of the licensee.

(2) A licensee will be deemed to have supplied information meeting the specifications of the